Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3 Registration of Vehicles
31-3-112.
Special plate for Gaspee Days Committee.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Gaspee Days Committee (hereafter referred to as “the Gaspee Days committee”). The plates shall be designed to reference the Gaspee Days committee.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plates.

The Gaspee Days committee motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Gaspee Days committee, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Gaspee Days committee plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Gaspee Days committee plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Gaspee Days committee and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Gaspee Days committee plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Gaspee Days committee in furtherance of its mission.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Gaspee Days committee.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of the Gaspee Days plates, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds, in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The Gaspee Days committee shall be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Gaspee Days committee plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 332, § 1.

31-3-113.
Special plate for Operation Stand Down RI.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for passenger vehicles based upon the not-for-profit entity Operation Stand Down RI.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

Operation Stand Down RI motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

Operation Stand Down RI plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type including, but not limited to, passenger and commercial. Operation Stand Down RI plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by Operation Stand Down RI and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order has been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division. Subsequent Operation Stand Down RI plate orders will be handled by the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, prepayment procedures, and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Operation Stand Down RI plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to Operation Stand Down RI in furtherance of its mission to “support our troops: in helping struggling and homeless veterans by offering housing and supportive services necessary to their well-being.”

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to Operation Stand Down RI.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Operation Stand Down RI plates, the organization must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

Operation Stand Down RI will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Operation Stand Down RI plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 400, § 1.

31-3-114.
Special plate for the Rhode Island Agricultural Council.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Rhode Island Agricultural Council. The plates shall be designed to reference Rhode Island agriculture and shall feature a barn and silo.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Rhode Island Agricultural Council motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Rhode Island Agricultural Council, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Rhode Island Agricultural Council plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Rhode Island Agricultural Council plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Rhode Island Agricultural Council and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Rhode Island Agricultural Council plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Rhode Island Agricultural Council in furtherance of its mission to stimulate development of an interest in agriculture, horticulture, forestry, and allied interests; create an interest in rural life and the improvement of the rural community in Rhode Island; effect a close relationship between representatives of agriculture with its allied interests and with commerce and industry; develop and carry out a complete program for efficient production and economical distribution of farm products in Rhode Island; and coordinate all agencies interested in the welfare of agriculture in Rhode Island into one association from which unified efforts toward education, legislation, and representation of agricultural interests of the state may emanate.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Rhode Island Agricultural Council.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of the Rhode Island Agricultural Council license plate, the council must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The Rhode Island Agricultural Council shall be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Rhode Island Agricultural Council plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 393, § 1.

31-3-115.
Special plate for the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation. The plates shall be designed to reference the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation and shall feature a striped bass.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation in furtherance of its mission to preserve our marine fisheries, environmental protection, restoration projects, and youth activity programs that foster recreational fishing, safety, and conservation.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation license plate, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation shall be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Rhode Island Salt Water Anglers Foundation plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 414, § 1.

31-3-116.
Special plate for the Ocean State Animal Coalition.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available a special motor vehicle registration plate for the Ocean State Animal Coalition.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner, as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Ocean State Animal Coalition motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The Ocean State Animal Coalition motor vehicle plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type. The Ocean State Animal Coalition plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order shall be handled by the Ocean State Animal Coalition and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Ocean State Animal Coalition motor vehicle plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar issuance ($40) surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20) shall be allocated to the general fund, and the remaining twenty dollars ($20) shall be distributed annually to the Ocean State Animal Coalition in furtherance of its mission to improve the status and well-being of animals in Rhode Island, including subsidizing spay and neuter services for cats and dogs.

The Ocean State Animal Coalition shall distribute the funds it receives as referenced in subsection (g) of this section to Rhode Island-based municipal animal shelters and other humane organizations pursuant to procedures developed in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.

The Ocean State Animal Coalition shall be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

A ten-dollar ($10) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Ocean State Animal Coalition.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Ocean State Animal Coalition motor vehicle plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 417, § 1.

31-3-117.
Minimum prepaid special motor vehicle registration plate orders.

As to any special motor vehicle registration plates that have been authorized pursuant to this chapter but that have not been issued or printed as of July 2, 2018, because the minimum number of prepaid orders for the plates has not been reached, the minimum number of plates that must be prepaid and ordered prior to the plates being made and issued shall be deemed to be six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type. If the minimum number of prepaid plates provided pursuant to any other section of this chapter is a higher number, that number shall be deemed reduced to six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type.

As to any special plates that are authorized pursuant to this chapter after July 2, 2018, the minimum number of plates that must be prepaid and ordered prior to the plates being made and issued shall be six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the minimum number of prepaid orders for special motor vehicle registration plates that either have been authorized pursuant to this chapter, but have not been issued or printed as of July 2, 2022, because the minimum number of prepaid orders for the plates has not been reached or are authorized pursuant to this chapter after July 2, 2022, may be reduced to one hundred fifty (150) sets of plates per plate type if the applicable sponsoring nonprofit entity delivers to the division of motor vehicles:

Orders for a minimum of one hundred fifty (150) sets of plates per plate type; and

A nonrefundable payment to compensate for the amount of special plate orders fewer than six hundred (600). The payment shall be calculated as follows: six hundred (600) orders, less the number of orders placed, multiplied by thirty dollars ($30.00).

The portion of the applicable sponsoring nonprofit entity’s issuance surcharge that is to be allocated to the general fund shall be deemed paid for the first six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type issued by the payment in an amount as determined by subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section.

The division of motor vehicles shall make available plates eligible for issuance pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section, no later than six (6) months after receipt of the orders and the nonrefundable payment in the amount determined by subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section; provided, however, that if multiple orders and payments in amounts pursuant to subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section are received from different sponsoring nonprofit entities, the division of motor vehicles shall be afforded no more than six (6) months for each separate plate that becomes eligible for issuance and may complete the work necessary for the issuance of one order at a time in the order of receipt.

The ability of applicable sponsoring nonprofit entities to reduce the minimum number of prepaid orders to one hundred fifty (150) sets of plates per plate type pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section shall expire on December 31, 2025. The division of motor vehicles shall complete the work necessary for issuance of all plates for which it receives the required orders and nonrefundable payments in the amount determined by subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section on or before December 31, 2025, in accordance with subsection (c)(3) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 269, § 1, effective July 2, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 270, § 1, effective July 2, 2022.

31-3-118.
Special plate for Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. The plates shall be designed to reference Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the RI state police.

Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures, and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. to assist in the fiscal needs and in furtherance of its mission.

A ten-dollar ($10) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals will go to Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc.

Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. motor vehicle license plates.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Day of Portugal and Portuguese Heritage in RI, Inc. plates, the organization must use any Rhode Island-sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 30, § 1.

31-3-119.
Special plate for Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit corporation Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America. The plates shall be designed to reference Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by the Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures, and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America to assist in the furtherance of its programs in the state of Rhode Island.

The Narragansett Council, Boy Scouts of America will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Rhode Island Boy Scout plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 112, § 1.

31-3-120.
Police chief emeritus — Gary Malikowski.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the motor vehicle of the former police chief of the town of West Greenwich, Gary Malikowski. This plate is to bear the identification “Police Chief Emeritus,” along with an appropriate designation number imprinted on it and shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Gary Malikowski may desire.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 344, § 1.

31-3-121.
Judge emeritus — Stephen J. Capineri.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the motor vehicle of the former judge of the Rhode Island family court, Stephen J. Capineri. This plate is to bear the identification “Judge Emeritus,” along with an appropriate designation number imprinted on it and shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Stephen J. Capineri may desire.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 300, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 301, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

31-3-122.
Special plate for Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse. The plates shall be designed to reference Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type (i.e., passenger, commercial, etc.). Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop pre-payment procedures, and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse in furtherance of its mission to assist charitable organizations in Rhode Island with fiscal needs to assist with historic renovation, preservation, and to improve public awareness and access to the Pomham Rocks Lighthouse.

A ten-dollar ($10) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse plates, the organization must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Friends of Pomham Rocks Lighthouse motor vehicle license plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 2, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 314, § 1, effective July 6, 2022.

31-3-123.
Special plate for Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals.
[Effective December 30, 2022.]

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit corporation Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals (“RISPCA”). The plates shall be designed to reference Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals, commemorating its one hundred fifty (150) years of service.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The RISPCA motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by the RISPCA in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The RISPCA plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type (i.e., passenger, commercial, etc.). The RISPCA plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the RISPCA, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop pre-payment procedures, and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the RISPCA plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the RISPCA to assist in the furtherance of its programs in the state of Rhode Island.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the RISPCA.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of RISPCA plates, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The RISPCA will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of RISPCA plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 426, § 1, effective December 30, 2022.

31-3-124.
Special plate for The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. [Effective January 2, 2023.]

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. The plates shall be designed to reference The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc., in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type (i.e., passenger, commercial, etc.). The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc., and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met, and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc., to assist in the fiscal needs required to maintain and protect this historic site for all to enjoy, and to continue in the fostering of The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. presence as an asset to Rhode Island’s economic growth and prosperity.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. license plates, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. shall be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of The Rose Island Lighthouse Foundation, Inc. plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 258, § 1, effective January 2, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 316, § 1, effective January 6, 2023.

31-3-125.
Special plate for the Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association. [Effective January 2, 2023.]

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association. The plates shall be designed to reference the Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type (i.e., passenger, commercial, etc.). The Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association in furtherance of its mission to preserve and protect the buildings of the Beavertail Lighthouse site and to maintain and make available key aspects of Beavertail’s history.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association license plates, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Beavertail Lighthouse Museum Association plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 261, § 1, effective January 2, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 313, § 1, effective January 6, 2023.